Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE

Cross references:

For creation of the department of transportation and divisions thereof, see § 24-1-128.7; for the duty of the department of transportation to maintain right-of-way fences, see § 35-46-111.

Section

PART 1 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

PART 2 THE HIGHWAY LAW

PART 3 HIGHWAY RELOCATION
ASSISTANCE ACT

PART 4 ROADSIDE ADVERTISING

PART 5 JUNKYARDS ADJACENT
TO HIGHWAYS

PART 6 TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
FOR THE ELDERLY AND FOR
PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

PART 7 PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
IN NONURBANIZED AREAS

PART 8 LOCAL RAIL SERVICE ASSISTANCE

PART 9 TRANSIT PLANNING IN AREAS WITH
POPULATION UNDER 200,000

PART 10 ADMINISTRATION OF FUNDS
UNDER THE "FEDERAL TRANSIT ACT"

PART 11 TRANSPORTATION PLANNING

PART 12 PUBLIC-PRIVATE INITIATIVES
PROGRAM

PART 13 ACQUISITION OF ABANDONED
RAILROAD RIGHTS-OF-WAY

PART 14 DESIGN-BUILD CONTRACTS

PART 15 PROVISION OF RETAIL
OR COMMERCIAL GOODS
AND SERVICES AT
PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
TRANSFER FACILITIES ON
DEPARTMENT-OWNED PROPERTY

PART 16 SAFE ROUTES TO SCHOOL